New York, session 2025-2026, A10403.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6-a of section 366 of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph i to read as follows: 3 i. The commissioner of health is directed to establish a waiting list 4 per designated waiver region once the federally approved capacity for 5 the waiver is reached. The commissioner shall draw from the regional 6 waiting list to accommodate eligible individuals once capacity allows in 7 each region. Unless the commissioner chooses to prioritize certain popu- 8 lations, including but not limited to eligible persons transitioning 9 from nursing facilities, the commissioner shall draw eligible persons 10 who have been on the waiting list in the order in which they came on in 11 each region, provided the eligible person resides in the approved waiver 12 region from which the vacancy occurred. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14838-04-6